test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kiapp_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩiâpp e-stem verkkokäpy: # Noun - full paradigm
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩiâpp
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩiâv
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩiâv
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ǩieʹpˈpe
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩiâvâst
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩiâvin
     ǩiâpp+N+Ess+Indef: ǩiâppân
     ǩiâpp+N+Par+Indef: ǩiâppâd
     ǩiâpp+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩiâvtää, ǩiâvtaa]
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩiâv
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ǩiâvi
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩiâvid
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩiâvid
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩiâvin
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩiâvivuiʹm
     ǩiâpp+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩiâvitää, ǩiâvitaa]
     ǩiâ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩiâvâž
